Utah statutes.
78B-6-517.   Substitution of bond for deposit paid into court -- Abandonment
of action by condemner -- Conditions of dismissal.
In the event that no order is entered by the court permitting payment of the
deposit on account of the just compensation to be awarded in the proceeding
within 30 days following its deposit, the court may, on application of the
condemning authority, permit the substitution of a bond in an amount and with
sureties as determined and approved by the court.  Condemner, whether a public
or private body, may, at any time prior to final payment of compensation and
damages awarded the defendant by the court or jury, abandon the proceedings
and cause the action to be dismissed without prejudice, provided, however,
that as a condition of dismissal condemner first compensate condemnee for all
damages he has sustained and also reimburse him in full for all reasonable and
necessary expenses actually incurred by condemnee because of the filing of the
action by condemner, including attorney fees.
